Colorado statutes. TITLE 2 Legislative
ARTICLE 2
GENERAL ASSEMBLY

Cross references:

For distribution of copies of reports made to the general assembly, see § 24-1-136 (9); for standards of conduct for members of the general assembly, see article 18 of title 24.

Section

PART 1 SENATORIAL DISTRICTS - APPORTIONMENT

PART 2 REPRESENTATIVE DISTRICTS - APPORTIONMENT

PART 3 ORGANIZATION - OPERATION

PART 4 INTERFERENCE WITH THE LEGISLATIVE PROCESS

PART 5 LEGISLATIVE DISTRICTS -
IMPLEMENTATION OF COMMISSION PLAN

PART 6 LEGISLATIVE COMMISSION

PART 7 ENACTMENT OF LAWS REGARDING
SENTENCING OF CRIMINAL OFFENDERS

PART 8 PLAIN LANGUAGE IN STATE LAWS

PART 9 CENSUS DATA FOR REDISTRICTING

PART 10 LEGISLATIVE INTERIM COMMITTEE ON HEALTH CARE SYSTEMS

PART 11 LEGISLATIVE INTERIM COMMITTEE ON STIMULATING ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT THROUGH BUSINESS PERSONAL PROPERTY TAX EXEMPTIONS AND OTHER METHODS

PART 12 POST-ENACTMENT REVIEW OF THE IMPLEMENTATION OF BILLS

PART 13 YOUTH ADVISORY COUNCIL

PART 14 ECONOMIC OPPORTUNITY POVERTY REDUCTION TASK FORCE ACT

PART 15 LEGISLATIVE TASK FORCE ON THE BUSINESS PERSONAL PROPERTY TAX

PART 16 LEGISLATIVE DEPARTMENT CASH FUND

PART 17 LOWER NORTH FORK WILDFIRE COMMISSION

PART 18 STANDARDS AND ASSESSMENTS TASK FORCE

PART 19 SCHOOL FINANCE STUDY

PART 20 LEGISLATIVE INTERIM COMMITTEE ON SCHOOL FINANCE